Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202666-1333
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Ethanol Development Act, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Agricultural production facility or ethanol facility means a plant or facility related to the processing, marketing, or distribution of ethanol, ethanol coproducts, products derived from ethanol or ethanol coproducts, or grain;

(2) Board means the Nebraska Ethanol Board;

(3) Ethanol producer means a person who devotes at least fifty percent of his or her professional time to ethanol production or business operations at an ethanol facility in Nebraska;

(4) Grain means wheat, corn, and grain sorghum; and

(5) Name plate design capacity means the original designed capacity of an ethanol or agricultural production facility. Capacity may be specified as bushels of grain processed or mass or volume of ethanol, ethanol coproducts, or products derived from ethanol or ethanol coproducts produced per year.

Laws 1986, LB 1230, § 3;

Laws 1989, LB 587, § 3;

Laws 1992, LB 754, § 2;

R.S.Supp.,1992, § 66-1303;

Laws 1993, LB 364, § 4;

Laws 1995, LB 377, § 6;

Laws 2004, LB 479, § 4;

Laws 2017, LB1, § 1;

Laws 2026, LB815, § 6.
July 18, 2026